Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2353
Public power and irrigation district funds; deposit required.

All funds of any public power district, public irrigation district, or public power and irrigation district organized and existing under the laws of this state shall be deposited by the treasurer or other competent officer of such district in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution as shall have been designated as official depositories for the funds belonging to such district. Such deposits shall either be made in accordance with and subject to agreements of such district with its bondholders or noteholders or, in the absence of any such agreement, shall be subject to the provisions and conditions provided in sections 77-2353 to 77-2361. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1941, c. 160, § 1, p. 642;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2537;

R.S.1943, § 77-2353;

Laws 1969, c. 544, § 2, p. 2198;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 66;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 62.